District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.72

Rulemaking authority.

(a)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(b)

Within 120 days after June 10, 2014, the Mayor shall issue rules to implement the amended provisions of this subchapter.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2372, 52 DCR 7503
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(ll), 61 DCR 3892
This section is referenced in § 2-218.42.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 added (b).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2372 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Resolution 18-267, the “Local, Small, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Contracting Regulations Approval Resolution of 2009”, was approved effective October 6, 2009.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.

Delegation of Authority—2014;Department of Small and Local Business Development, see Mayor's Order 2005-136, September 27, 2005 ( 53 DCR 154).
Delegation of Authority pursuant to section 2372 of the Small, Local, and Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of 2005, see Mayor's Order 2009-58, April 15, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6797).